Washington statutes.
RCW 19.170.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Continuing obligation check" means a document that is a check, draft, note, bond, or other negotiable instrument that, when cashed, deposited, or otherwise used, imposes on the payee an obligation to enter into a loan transaction. This definition does not include checks, drafts, or other negotiable instruments that are used by consumers to take advances on revolving loans, credit cards, or revolving credit accounts.

(2) "Financial institution" means any bank, trust company, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, industrial loan company, or consumer finance lender subject to regulation by an official agency of this state or the United States, and any subsidiary or affiliate thereof.

(3) "Offer" means a written notice delivered by hand, mail, or other print medium offering goods, services, or property made as part of a promotion to a person based on a representation that the person has been awarded, or will be awarded, a prize.

(4) "Person" means an individual, corporation, the state or its subdivisions or agencies, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, cooperative, or any other legal entity.

(5) "Prize" means a gift, award, travel coupon or certificate, free item, or any other item offered in a promotion that is different and distinct from the goods, service, or property promoted by a sponsor. "Prize" does not include an item offered in a promotion where all of the following elements are present:

(a) No element of chance is involved in obtaining the item offered in the promotion;

(b) The recipient has the right to review the merchandise offered for sale without obligation for at least seven days, and has a right to obtain a full refund in thirty days for the return of undamaged merchandise;

(c) The recipient may keep the item offered in the promotion without obligation; and

(d) The recipient is not required to attend any sales presentation or spend any sum in order to receive the item offered in the promotion.

(6) "Promoter" means a person conducting a promotion.

(7) "Promotion" means an advertising program, sweepstakes, contest, direct giveaway, or solicitation directed to specific named individuals, that includes the award of or chance to be awarded a prize, but does not include a promotional contest of chance under RCW 9.46.0356(1)(b).

(8) "Simulated check" means a document that is not currency or a check, draft, note, bond, or other negotiable instrument but has the visual characteristics thereof. "Simulated check" does not include a nonnegotiable check, draft, note, or other instrument that is used for soliciting orders for the purchase of checks, drafts, notes, bonds, or other instruments and that is clearly marked as a sample, specimen, or nonnegotiable.

(9) "Sponsor" means a person on whose behalf a promotion is conducted to promote or advertise goods, services, or property of that person.

(10) "Verifiable retail value" means:

(a) A price at which a promoter or sponsor can demonstrate that a substantial number of prizes have been sold at retail in the local market by a person other than the promoter or sponsor; or

(b) If the prize is not available for retail sale in the local market, the retail fair market value in the local market of an item substantially similar in each significant aspect, including size, grade, quality, quantity, ingredients, and utility; or

(c) If the value of the prize cannot be established under (a) or (b) of this subsection, then the prize may be valued at no more than three times its cost to the promoter or sponsor.

[ 2011 c 303 s 3; 1991 c 227 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Findings—Intent—2011 c 303: See note following RCW 9.46.0356.